California statutes. Education Code
(a) A program specialist is a specialist who holds a valid special education credential, clinical services credential, health services credential, or a school psychologist authorization and has advanced training and related experience in the education of individuals with exceptional needs and a specialized in-depth knowledge in preschool disabilities, career vocational development, or one or more areas of major disabling conditions.

(b) A program specialist may do all the
 following:

(1) Observe, consult with, and assist resource specialists, designated instruction and services instructors, and special class teachers.

(2) Plan programs, coordinate curricular resources, and evaluate effectiveness of programs for individuals with exceptional needs.

(3) Participate in each school’s staff development, program development, and innovation of special methods and approaches.

(4) Provide coordination, consultation and program development primarily in one specialized area or areas of his or her expertise.

(5) Be responsible for assuring that pupils have full educational opportunity regardless of the district of residence.

(c) For purposes of Section 41403, a program specialist shall be considered a pupil services employee, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41401.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 31.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

56369.

A local educational agency may contract with another public agency to provide special education or related services to an individual with exceptional needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Review [56380. - 56383.]

56380.

(a) Pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of Section 1414 of Title 20 of the United States Code, the local educational agency shall maintain procedures to ensure that the individualized education program team does both of the following:

(1) Reviews the pupil’s individualized education program periodically, but not less frequently than annually, to determine whether the annual goals for the pupil are being achieved.

(2) Revises the individualized education program as appropriate to address, among other matters, the provisions specified in subdivision (d) of Section 56341.1.

(b) The annual review of an individualized education program shall be conducted in accordance with the notice and scheduling requirements for the initial assessment.

(c) This section does not preclude other meetings of the individualized education program team from occurring as provided in Section 56343.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 653, Sec. 34.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

56380.1.

(a) In making changes to a pupil’s individualized education program after the annual individualized education program meeting for a school year, the parent of the individual with exceptional needs and the local educational agency may agree, pursuant to Section 1414(d)(3)(D) of Title 20 of the United States Code, not to convene an individualized education program meeting for the purposes of making those changes, and instead may develop a written document, signed by the parent and by a representative of the local educational agency, to amend or modify the pupil’s existing individualized education program.

(b) Changes to the individualized education program may be made, in accordance with Section 1414(d)(3)(F) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 300.324(a)(6) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, either by the entire individualized education program team at an individualized education program team meeting, or, as provided in subdivision (a), by amending the individualized education program rather than by redrafting the entire individualized education program. Upon request, a parent shall be provided with a revised copy of the individualized education program with the amendments incorporated.

(c) If changes are made to the pupil’s individualized education program, in accordance with subdivisions (a) and (b), the local educational agency shall ensure that the pupil’s individualized education program team is informed of those changes as required by Section 300.324(a)(4)(ii) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 25.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56381.

(a) (1) A reassessment of the pupil, based upon procedures specified in Section 56302.1 and in Article 2 (commencing with Section 56320), and in accordance with Section 1414(a), (b), and (c) of Title 20 of the United States Code, shall be conducted if the local educational agency determines that the educational or related services needs, including improved academic achievement and functional performance, of the pupil warrant a reassessment, or if the pupil’s parents or teacher requests a reassessment.

(2) A reassessment shall occur not more frequently than once a year, unless the parent and the local educational agency agree otherwise, and shall occur at least once every three years, unless the parent and the local educational agency agree, in writing, that a reassessment is unnecessary.

If the reassessment so indicates, a new individualized education program shall be developed.

(b) As part of a reassessment, the individualized education program team and other qualified professionals, as appropriate, shall do the following:

(1) Review existing assessment data on the pupil, including assessments and information provided by the parents of the pupil, as specified in Section 300.305(a)(1)(i) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, current classroom-based assessments and observations, and teacher and related services providers’ observations.

(2) On the basis of the review conducted pursuant to paragraph (1), and input from the parents of the pupil, identify what additional data, if any, is needed to determine:

(A) Whether the pupil continues to have a disability described in Section 1401(3) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(B) The present levels of performance and educational needs of the pupil.

(C) Whether the pupil continues to need special education and related services.

(D) Whether any additions or modifications to the special education and related services are needed to enable the pupil to meet the measurable annual goals set out in the individualized education program of the pupil and to participate, as appropriate, in the general curriculum.

(c) The local educational agency shall administer tests and other assessment materials needed to produce the data identified by the individualized education program team.

(d) If the individualized education program team and other qualified professionals, as appropriate, determine that no additional data is needed to determine whether the pupil continues to be an individual with exceptional needs, and to determine the educational needs of the pupil, the local educational agency shall notify the parents of the pupil of that determination and the reasons for it, and the right of the parents to request an assessment to determine whether the pupil continues to be an individual with exceptional needs, and to determine the educational needs of the pupil. The local educational agency is not required to conduct an assessment, unless requested by the parents of the pupil.

(e) A local educational agency shall assess an individual with exceptional needs in accordance with this section and procedures specified in Article 2 (commencing with Section 56320), as provided in Section 300.306(c)(2) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(f) (1) A reassessment may not be conducted, unless the written consent of the parent is obtained prior to reassessment, except pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 56506. Pursuant to Section 300.300(c)(1) and (2) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, informed parental consent need not be obtained for the reassessment of an individual with exceptional needs if the local educational agency can demonstrate that it has taken reasonable measures to obtain that consent and the parent of the child has failed to respond.

(2) To meet the reasonable measure requirements of this subdivision, the local educational agency shall use procedures consistent with those set forth in Section 300.322(d) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) If the parent refuses to consent to the reassessment, the local educational agency may, but is not required to, pursue the reassessment by using the consent override procedures described in Section 300.300(a)(3) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) The local educational agency does not violate its obligations under Section 300.111 and Sections 300.301 to 300.311, inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations if it declines to pursue the reassessment.

(g) The individualized education program team and other qualified professionals referenced in subdivision (b) may conduct the review without a meeting, as provided in Section 300.305(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(h) Before determining that the individual is no longer an individual with exceptional needs, a local educational agency shall assess the individual in accordance with Section 56320 and this section, as appropriate, and in accordance with Section 1414 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(i) (1) The assessment described in subdivision (h) shall not be required before the termination of a pupil’s eligibility under this part due to graduation from secondary school with a regular diploma, or due to exceeding the age eligibility for a free appropriate public education under Section 56026.

(2) For a pupil whose eligibility under this part terminates under circumstances described in paragraph (1), a local educational agency shall provide the pupil with a summary of the academic achievement and functional performance of the pupil, which shall include recommendations on the manner in which to assist the pupil in meeting his or her postsecondary educational goals as required in Section 1414(c)(5)(B)(ii) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(j) To the extent possible, the local educational agency shall encourage the consolidation of reassessment meetings for the individual with exceptional needs and other individualized education program team meetings for the individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 26.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56382.

All review and reassessment procedures for individuals with exceptional needs who are younger than three years of age shall be provided pursuant to Chapter 4.4 (commencing with Section 56425) and the California Early Intervention Services Act, Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 17.1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

56383.

Pursuant to Section 300.325(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, after an individual with exceptional needs is placed in a nonpublic, nonsectarian school under Section 56366, any meetings to review and revise the pupil’s individualized education program may be conducted by the nonpublic, nonsectarian school at the discretion of the local educational agency. However, even if a nonpublic, nonsectarian school implements a child’s individualized education program, responsibility for compliance with this part and with the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and implementing regulations remains with the local educational agency pursuant to Section 300.325(c) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Participation in Statewide and Districtwide Assessment Programs [56385. - 56385.]

56385.

(a) As provided in paragraph (16) of subsection (a) of Section 1412 of Title 20 of the United States Code, individuals with exceptional needs shall be included in general statewide and districtwide assessment programs, including assessments described under Section 1111 of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.), with appropriate accommodations and alternate assessments where necessary and as indicated in their respective individualized education programs.

(b) The Superintendent, or in the case of a districtwide assessment, the local educational agency, shall develop and implement guidelines for the participation of individuals with exceptional needs in alternate assessments for those pupils who cannot participate in regular assessments described in subdivision (a) with accommodations as indicated by their respective individualized education programs. The guidelines shall provide for alternate assessments that meet the following requirements:

(1) Are aligned with the state’s challenging academic content standards and challenging pupil academic achievement standards.

(2) If the state has adopted alternate academic achievement standards permitted under the regulations promulgated to carry out paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 1111 of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, measure the achievement of individuals with exceptional needs against those standards.

(c) The department, or in the case of a districtwide assessment, the local educational agency, shall make available to the public reports regarding the assessment of pupils that have been identified as individuals with exceptional needs with the same frequency and in the same detail as it reports on the assessment of pupils that have not been so identified, in accordance with subparagraph (D) of paragraph (16) of subsection (a) of Section 1412 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(d) The Superintendent, or, in the case of a districtwide assessment, the local educational agency, shall, to the extent feasible, pursuant to subparagraph (E) of paragraph (16) of subsection (a) of Section 1412 of Title 20 of the United States Code, use universal design principles in developing and administering any assessments under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 653, Sec. 37.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.1. Recognition for Educational Achievement or Completion of Program [56390. - 56392.]

56390.

Notwithstanding Section 51412 or any other provision of law, a local educational agency may award an individual with exceptional needs a certificate or document of educational achievement or completion if the requirements of subdivision (a), (b), or (c) are met.

(a) The individual has satisfactorily completed a prescribed alternative course of study approved by the governing board of the school district in which the individual attended school or the school district with jurisdiction over the individual and identified in his or her individualized education program.

(b) The individual has satisfactorily met his or her individualized education program goals and objectives during high school as determined by the individualized education program team.

(c) The individual has satisfactorily attended high school, participated in the instruction as prescribed in his or her individualized education program, and has met the objectives of the statement of transition services.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 56375 by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 111.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

56391.

An individual with exceptional needs who meets the criteria for a certificate or document described in Section 56390 shall be eligible to participate in any graduation ceremony and any school activity related to graduation in which a pupil of similar age without disabilities would be eligible to participate. The right to participate in graduation ceremonies does not equate a certificate or document described in Section 56390 with a regular high school diploma.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 57.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

56392.

It is not the intent of the Legislature by enacting this chapter to eliminate the opportunity for an individual with exceptional needs to earn a standard diploma issued by a local or state educational agency when the pupil has completed the prescribed course of study and has passed the proficiency requirements with or without differential standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 54.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.3. Family Empowerment Centers on Disability [56400. - 56415.]

56400.

It is the intent of the Legislature, through enactment of this chapter and as required by state and federal law, to do all of the following:

(a) Ensure that children and young adults with disabilities are provided a free and appropriate public education in the least restrictive environment possible in accordance with their needs and capabilities and applicable federal and state law and regulations.

(b) Ensure that children and young adults with disabilities receive the necessary educational support and services they need to complete
 their education with the skills they need to meaningfully participate in their communities.

(c) Offer parents and families of children and young adults with disabilities access to accurate information, specialized training, and peer-to-peer support in their communities in a linguistically and culturally affirming manner.

(d) Ensure that parents and families of children and young adults with disabilities are full participants in their child’s education, school reform, and comprehensive systems change efforts.

(e) Build upon existing local and regional service delivery systems to improve, expand, and offer coordinated technical assistance to the network of existing resources available for parents and families of children and young adults with disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 88.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

56402.

(a) The department shall award grants to establish Family Empowerment Centers on Disability. In the first year of operation, the department shall award these grants no later than February 15, 2002. In subsequent years, to the extent funding is available, the department shall award these grants no later than February 15 of that year, except as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(b) (1) The department shall, by March 1, 2022, award grants to establish new Family Empowerment Centers on Disability in the 41 regions in the state established under the Early Start Family Resource Centers that do not have a Family Empowerment
 Center on Disability.

(2) In making awards pursuant to this subdivision, the Superintendent shall give priority to applicants that are able to ensure continuity of support for families transitioning from services under Part C to Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), either because the applicant operates a program of family support for parents of children with disabilities up to three years of age, or the applicant works in close partnership with an organization that does so, and shall take into consideration the capacity of applicants to carry out the activities specified in Section 56408.

(c) Once funding is secured, and annually until all centers are established, the department shall submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature documenting progress in establishing new centers
 pursuant to this section.

(d) The department shall develop the grant application, with advice from stakeholders, including parents and family members of children with disabilities, adults with disabilities, the Advisory Commission on Special Education, and representatives of community agencies serving children and adults with disabilities.

(e) The sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be made available to the department, from the funds appropriated for purposes of this chapter, for the purpose of securing an outside contractor to develop a request for proposal, disseminate the proposal, empanel readers to evaluate the proposals, and cover other costs related to this process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 90.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

56404.

To be eligible to receive funding to establish Family Empowerment Centers on Disability pursuant to this chapter, applicants shall meet the following organizational requirements:

(a) Be a nonprofit charitable organization organized under the Internal Revenue Code pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 501 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(b) Be staffed primarily by parents, guardians, and family members of children and young adults with disabilities and by adults with disabilities.

(c) Have as a majority of board members of each center, parents, guardians, and family members of children and young adults with disabilities who have experience with local or regional disability systems and educational resources. Additional members shall include, but not be limited to, persons with disabilities and representatives of community agencies serving adults with disabilities, and other community agencies.

(d) Demonstrate the capacity to provide services in accordance with the family support guidelines developed by the Early Start Family Resource Centers pursuant to Section 95004 of the Government Code and administered by the State Department of Developmental Services, and Parent Training Information Centers established pursuant to Sections 1482 and 1483 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

56406.

(a) The department shall issue requests for proposals, select grantees, and award grants pursuant to this chapter. Grants awarded to Family Empowerment Centers on Disability by the
 department shall be based upon a formula that does both of the following:

(1) Establishes a minimum base rate of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for each center to provide the basic services pursuant to this chapter and serve parents and families of children and young adults 3 to 18 years of age, inclusive, and
 young adults 19 to 22 years of age, inclusive,
 who had an individualized education program before their 18th birthday.

(2) Establishes an allocation mechanism that is determined according to school enrollment of the region served.

(b) Commencing on July 1, 2021, grants awarded to Family Empowerment Centers on Disability by the department shall be based upon a formula that does both of the following:

(1) Establishes a minimum base rate of two hundred forty-six thousand dollars ($246,000) for each center to provide the basic services pursuant to this chapter and
 serve parents and families of children and young adults 3 to 18 years of age, inclusive, and young adults 19 to 22 years of age, inclusive, who had an individualized education program before their 18th birthday.

(2) Establishes an allocation mechanism that is determined according to school enrollment of the region served.

(c) The department shall give positive consideration to applicants proposing to establish new Family Empowerment Centers on Disability to serve regions that have high concentrations of pupils who qualify for free or reduced-price meals.

(d) Each grant applicant shall demonstrate all of the following:

(1) Knowledge of the needs of underserved parents and families of children and young adults with disabilities in the area to be served will be effectively met.

(2) The ability to conduct effective community engagement to assess family needs on a regular basis.

(3) Expertise in providing effective training and information to parents and families to meet their identified needs.

(4) How services will be delivered in a manner that accomplishes all of the following:

(A) All families have access to services regardless of cultural, linguistic, geographical, socioeconomic, or other similar barriers.

(B) Services are
 provided in accordance with families’ linguistic and cultural preferences and needs.

(C) Services are coordinated with the existing family support organizations within the region, including, but not limited to, Early Start Family Resource Centers, or other organizations that provide family support for parents of children with disabilities up to three years of age.

(D) Promotes positive parent and professional collaboration with local educational agencies, special education local plan areas, and other community agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 90.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

56408.

(a) As a condition of receipt of funds, each Family Empowerment Center on Disability that receives assistance under this chapter and serves the parents and families of children and young adults
 3 to 18 years of age, inclusive, and young adults 19 to 22 years of age, inclusive, who had an individualized education program before their 18th birthday shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide training and information that meets the training and information needs of parents and
 families of children and young adults with disabilities living in the area served by the center, particularly those families and individuals who have been
 underserved.

(2) Work with community-based organizations, including community advisory committees established pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 56190) of Chapter 2, parent advisory committees of one or more local educational agencies in their service region established pursuant to Sections 52063 and 52069, and state and local agencies serving children with disabilities.

(3) Train and support parents and families of children and young adults with disabilities to do all of the following:

(A) Better understand the nature of their children’s disabilities and their
 children’s educational and developmental
 needs, including the benefits of inclusion in a least restrictive educational environment.

(B) Participate in activities to address disparities in opportunities and improve outcomes for children and young adults with disabilities.

(C) Advocate for the child’s needs in a manner that promotes alternative forms of dispute resolution and
 positive relationships between parents and professionals.

(4) Support parents with how to access language access support, including interpretation and translation of written materials, that is additional to language access support required to be provided by local educational agencies.

(5) Support parents in navigating referrals for services, such as support for pupil and family needs, respite services, physical and mental health services, and other necessary services depending on family circumstances.

(6) Assist parents in accessing support through other programs, such as the Foster Youth Services Coordinating Program and programs administered by the State Department of Developmental Services and the Department of Rehabilitation.

(7) Support parents in communicating effectively with personnel responsible for providing special education, early intervention, and related services.

(8) Serve as a resource to parents and families in decisionmaking processes and the development of individualized education programs.

(9) Provide parents appropriate information regarding the range of options, programs, services, and resources available to assist children and young adults with disabilities and their families.

(10) Subject to the availability of resources and upon parental request, attend individualized education program development meetings that include parents and personnel responsible for assessing pupil eligibility for special education and early intervention services.

(11) Submit data annually, in accordance with the data template established by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56411, no later than a date selected by the Superintendent. The Superintendent shall select this date by June 30, 2022.

(b) (1) Following the initial awarding of a grant to a Family Empowerment Center on Disability, the department shall assess the center’s eligibility for continued funding, at a minimum, as follows:

(A) For a Family
 Empowerment Center on Disability established during or after the 2020–21 fiscal year, the department shall assess the center’s eligibility every five years after the center is established.

(B) For a Family Empowerment Center on Disability established before the 2020–21 fiscal year, the department shall assess the center’s eligibility during the 2023–24 fiscal year and every five years thereafter.

(2) Assessments conducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be based on a Family Empowerment Center on Disability’s demonstrated ability to meet the requirements of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 91.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

56410.

A statewide Family Empowerment and Disability Council, composed of the executive directors for the Family Empowerment Centers on Disability, shall be established. Membership on the Family Empowerment and Disability Council may also include the
 executive director
 or representative from the Early Start Family Resource Centers, funded by the State Department of Developmental Services, and from the parent centers funded by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.). The department shall contract with an outside entity experienced with developing a statewide technical assistance disability network to facilitate the council. A base amount of
 two hundred
 forty-six thousand dollars ($246,000) shall be made available, from the annual appropriation made for the Family Empowerment Centers on Disability, to support the work of the council. The Family Empowerment and Disability Council shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(a) Provide central coordination of training and information dissemination, content, and materials for Family Empowerment Centers on
 Disability to ensure parents across the state have equitable access to training and information.

(b) Develop a technical assistance system and activities to support continuous improvement of the Family Empowerment Centers on Disability in accordance with a plan developed in conjunction with the directors of the Family Empowerment Centers on Disability.

(c) Ensure that an outside entity provides assistance in developing a statewide technical assistance disability network, and performs an annual, independent
 evaluation of the effectiveness of the services provided by Family Empowerment
 Centers on Disability that shall include, but is not limited to, an evaluation of the data points listed in subdivision (b) of Section 56411. The goal shall be to improve center management, parental satisfaction with the services received, and the quality and effectiveness of services delivered.

(d) Assist each center to build its capacity to serve its geographic region.

(e) Conduct media outreach and other public education efforts to promote the goals of the Family Empowerment Centers on Disability.

(f) Support and participate with the department in activities aligned with improvement activities within the statewide system
 of support established pursuant to Section 52059.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 92.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

56411.

(a) The department, on or before June 30, 2022, shall develop or update a uniform and coordinated tracking and data collection system, and establish or update outcome-based evaluation procedures and processes, for use by Family Empowerment Centers on Disability to demonstrate the centers’ ability to meet the requirements of Section 56408. The tracking and data collection system shall not be duplicative of, and shall interface with, existing special education data systems.

(b) The department, on or before June 30, 2022, shall develop a data collection template for use by Family Empowerment Centers on Disability that shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The number of parent and family trainings provided by the center, including, but not limited to, trainings on individualized education programs and least restrictive educational environments.

(2) The number of individualized education program meetings attended by personnel of a center.

(3) The disability categories of children and young adults served by the center.

(4) Demographic information of parents and pupils served by the center, including, but not limited to, the pupil’s disability, the pupil’s free or reduced-price meal eligibility, English learner classification, and the parent’s primary language.

(5) The nature of disagreements between parents and schools or school districts, and the manner in which these disagreements were
 resolved with the assistance of the center.

(6) Measures of parental satisfaction with services provided by the center collected in a standardized format across centers to allow for comparable survey results.

(c) The department shall provide guidance to Family Empowerment Centers on Disability on how to define and report data for purposes of this section.

(d) The department shall consult with the Family Empowerment and Disability Council on the development of the data collection template.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 93.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

56412.

When at least four Family Empowerment Centers on Disability have been in operation for two years, the State Department of Education shall contract, pursuant to funding made available in that fiscal year’s Budget Act, with an outside entity to conduct an evaluation of the effectiveness of the services provided by the centers, including, but not limited to, the number of parents who have been trained, the number of cases handled by the centers, an estimate of the number of lawsuits avoided, and the overall effectiveness of the centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 690, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

56414.

The State Department of Education is required to implement this chapter only if an appropriation is made for this purpose in the Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 690, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

56415.

On or before June 30, 2023, the department shall do both of the following:

(a) Inform parents of children with disabilities of the availability of Family Empowerment Centers on Disability services by including in its notice of procedural safeguards information on the purpose of the centers and the web address of its internet website that lists contact information for the centers.

(b) Include the information described in subdivision (a) on all of the department’s translated versions of its notice of procedural safeguards and on a sample notice of procedural safeguards that it shall maintain on its internet website.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 95.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.4. Early Education for Individuals with Exceptional Needs [56425. - 56432.]

56425.

As a condition of receiving state aid pursuant to this part, a local educational agency that operated early education programs for individuals with exceptional needs younger than three years of age, as defined in Section 56026, and that received state or federal aid for special education for those programs in the 1980–81 fiscal year, shall continue to operate early education programs in the 1981–82 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.

If a local educational agency offered those programs in the 1980–81 fiscal year but in a subsequent year transfers the programs to another local educational agency, the local educational agency shall be exempt from the provisions of this section in any year when the programs are offered by the local educational agency to which they were transferred.

A local educational agency that is required to offer a program pursuant to this section shall be eligible for funding pursuant to Section 56432.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56425.5.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that early education programs for infants identified as individuals with exceptional needs that provide educational services with active parent involvement, can significantly reduce the potential impact of many disabling conditions, and positively influence later development when the child reaches schoolage.

Early education programs funded pursuant to Sections 56427, 56428, and 56432 shall provide a continuum of program options provided by a transdisciplinary team to meet the multiple and varied needs of infants and their families. Recognizing the parent as the infant’s primary teacher, it is the Legislature’s intent that early education programs shall include opportunities for the family to receive home visits and to participate in family involvement activities pursuant to Sections 56426.1 and 56426.4. It is the intent of the Legislature that, as an infant grows older, program emphasis would shift from home-based services to a combination of home-based and group services.

It is further the intent of the Legislature that services rendered by state and local agencies serving infants with exceptional needs and their families be coordinated and maximized.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1998.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 40) and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 854, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1998.   Section operative July 1, 1998, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

56426.

An early education program shall include services specially designed to meet the unique needs of infants, from birth to three years of age, and their families. The primary purpose of an early education program is to enhance development of the infant. To meet this purpose, the program shall focus upon the infant and his or her family, and shall include home visits, group services, and family involvement activities. Early education programs funded pursuant to Sections 56427, 56428, and 56432 shall include, as program options, home-based services pursuant to Section 56426.1 and home-based and group services pursuant to Section 56426.2, and shall be provided in accordance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Secs. 1431 to 1445, incl.), and the California Early Intervention Services Act, Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 691, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

56426.1.

(a) Home-based early education services funded pursuant to Sections 56427, 56428, and 56432 shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Observing the infant’s behavior and development in his or her natural environment.
